Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Film Industry Incentives

148.542.
Definitions for KRS 148.542 to 148.546. [Repealed]

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 43, effective June 26, 2009; 2015 ch. 74, § 1, effective June 24, 2015; 2018 ch. 171, § 61, effective April 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 207, § 61, effective April 27, 2018; repealed by 2021 ch. 156, § 35, effective January 1, 2022.

148.544.
Purposes of KRS 141.383 and 148.542 to 148.546 — Kentucky Film Office — Eligibility for refundable motion picture or entertainment production tax incentives — Incentives available. [Repealed]

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 44, effective June 26, 2009; 2014, ch. 102, § 12, effective July 15, 2014; 2015 ch. 74, § 2, effective June 24, 2015; 2018 ch. 171, § 62, effective April 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 207, § 62, effective April 27, 2018; repealed by 2021 ch. 156, § 35, effective January 1, 2022.

148.545.
Acquisition of land for Cumberland Gap National Historical Park. [Repealed.]

148.546.
Application for motion picture or entertainment production tax incentives — Tax incentive agreement — Required terms — Administrative fee — Review — Verification of expenditure reports — Annual reports. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 45, effective June 26, 2009; 2010 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 7, effective June 4, 2010; 2014, ch. 134, § 2, effective July 15, 2014; 2015 ch. 74, § 3, effective June 24, 2015; 2018 ch. 199, § 6, effective July 14, 2018; repealed by 2021 ch. 156, § 35, effective January 1, 2022.

148.548.
Kentucky Film Commission — Functions and purpose — Members — Meetings — Nonvoting ex officio members. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 46, effective June 26, 2009; repealed by 2021 ch. 156, § 35, effective January 1, 2022.

148.550.
Transfer of funds and facilities to department. [Repealed.]